Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.600

State geological survey.

The department shall assume full charge and supervision of the state geological survey and perform such other duties as may be prescribed by law.

[ 2003 c 334 s 107; 1988 c 127 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.21.050. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 69; RRS s 10827. Formerly RCW 43.30.125, 43.21.050.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.

Mining survey reports, forwarding to: RCW 78.06.030.

Provisions relating to geological survey: Chapter 43.92 RCW, RCW 43.27A.130.